cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/vi_rules
// replace combining (tone) accents with single characters
.replace
à	à
á	á
ả	ả
ã	ã
ạ	ạ


ằ	ằ
ắ	ắ
ẳ	ẳ
ẵ	ẵ
ặ	ặ

ầ	ầ
ấ	ấ
ẩ	ẩ
ẫ	ẫ
ậ	ậ

è	è
é	é
ẻ	ẻ
ẽ	ẽ
ẹ	ẹ

ề	ề
ế	ế
ể	ể
ễ	ễ
ệ	ệ

ì	ì
í	í
ỉ	ỉ
ĩ	ĩ
ị	ị

ò	ò
ó	ó
ỏ	ỏ
õ	õ
ọ	ọ

ồ	ồ
ố	ố
ổ	ổ
ỗ	ỗ
ộ	ộ

ờ	ờ
ớ	ớ
ở	ở
ỡ	ỡ
ợ	ợ

ù	ù
ú	ú
ủ	ủ
ũ	ũ
ụ	ụ

ừ	ừ
ứ	ứ
ử	ử
ữ	ữ
ự	ự

ỳ	ỳ
ý	ý
ỷ	ỷ
ỹ	ỹ
ỵ	ỵ


//================================
//  Consonants
//================================

.group b
        b          b
     _) b          _b

.group c
        c          k
        c (_       kh
        ch         c         // try [tS;] [tS] [c]

.group d
        d          J         // try [z] [J] [dZ] [dZ;] [J^]

.group đ
        đ          d
     _) đ          _d

.group f
        f          f


.group g
        g          Q         // try [g] [Q]
        gh         Q         // or [g]  [Q]
        g (i       D         // try [D] [z] [j] [J^] [z;] [J] [dZ]
        g (ì       D
        g (í       D
        g (ỉ       D
        g (ĩ       D
        g (ị       D
        gi         D

.group h
        h          h


.group j
        j          Z


.group k
        k          k
        k (_       kh
        kh         x

.group l
        l          l

.group m
        m          m

.group n
        n          n
        ng         N
        ngh        N
        nh         n^

.group ñ
        ñ          n^

.group p
        p          p
        ph         f

.group q
        q          k
        q (_       kh
        qu         kw

.group r
        r          z.        // try [z] [z.] [r] [z;]

.group s
        s          s.        // try [s.] [s] [S]

.group t
        t          t[
        th         t
        tr         cr        // try [cr] [tr] [tS;] [tS] [c] [dZ] [dz;]

.group v
        v          v

.group w
        w          w

.group x
        x          s

.group z
        z          z


//================================
//  Vowels
//================================

.group a
        a          a:
        ai         a:I
        aì         a:I2
        aí         a:I3
        aỉ         a:I4
        aĩ         a:I5
        aị         a:I6
        ay         aI
        aỳ         aI2
        aý         aI3
        aỷ         aI4
        aỹ         aI5
        aỵ         aI6
        ao         a:U
        aò         a:U2
        aó         a:U3
        aỏ         a:U4
        aõ         a:U5
        aọ         a:U6
        au         aU
        aù         aU2
        aú         aU3
        aủ         aU4
        aũ         aU5
        aụ         aU6

.group à
        à          a:2
        ài         a:I2
        ày         aI2
        ào         a:U2
        àu         aU2

.group á
        á          a:3
        ái         a:I3
        áy         aI3
        áo         a:U3
        áu         aU3

.group ả
        ả          a:4
        ải         a:I4
        ảy         aI4
        ảo         a:U4
        ảu         aU4

.group ã
        ã          a:5
        ãi         a:I5
        ãy         aI5
        ão         a:U5
        ãu         aU5

.group ạ
        ạ          a:6
        ại         a:I6
        ạy         aI6
        ạo         a:U6
        ạu         aU6

//================================
.group ă
        ă          a

.group ằ
        ằ          a2

.group ắ
        ắ          a3

.group ẳ
        ẳ          a4

.group ẵ
        ẵ          a5

.group ặ
        ặ          a6

//=================================
.group â
        â          @
        ây         @I
        âu         @U

.group ầ
        ầ          @2
        ầy         @I2
        ầu         @U2

.group ấ
        ấ          @3
        ấy         @I3
        ấu         @U3

.group ẩ
        ẩ          @4
        ẩy         @I4
        ẩu         @U4

.group ẫ
        ẫ          @5
        ẫy         @I5
        ẫu         @U5

.group ậ
        ậ          @6
        ậy         @I6
        ậu         @U6

//===========================
.group e
        e          E
        eo         EU
        eò         EU2
        eó         EU3
        eỏ         EU4
        eỗ         EU5
        eọ         EU6

.group è
        è          E2
        èo         EU2

.group é
        é          E3
        éo         EU3

.group ẻ
        ẻ          E4
        ẻo         EU4

.group ẽ
        ẽ          E5
        ẽo         EU5

.group ẹ
        ẹ          E6
        ẹo         EU6

//============================

.group ê
        ê          e
        êu         eU

.group ề
        ề          e2
        ều         eU2

.group ế
        ế          e3
        ếu         eU3

.group ể
        ể          e4
        ểu         eU4

.group ễ
        ễ          e5
        ễu         eU5

.group ệ
        ệ          e6
        ệu         eU6


//============================
.group i
        i          i
        i (A       j
        ia         i@
        ià         i@2
        iá         i@3
        iả         i@4
        iã         i@5
        iạ         i@6
        iê         i@
        iề         i@2
        iế         i@3
        iể         i@4
        iễ         i@5
        iệ         i@6
        iu         iU
        iù         iU2
        iú         iU3
        iủ         iU4
        iũ         iU5
        iụ         iU6
//        iêu      i@U

.group ì
        ì          i2
        ì (A       j2
        ìa         i@2
        ìu         iU2

.group í
        í          i3
        í (A       j3
        ía         i@3
        íu         iU3

.group ỉ
        ỉ          i4
        ỉ (A       j4
        ỉa         i@4
        ỉu         iU4

.group ĩ
        ĩ          i5
        ĩ (A       j5
        ĩa         i@5
        ĩu         iU5

.group ị
        ị          i6
        ị (A       j6
        ịa         i@6
        ịu         iU6



//=========================
.group o
        o          O
        o (A       w
        oi         OI
        oì         OI2
        oí         OI3
        oỉ         OI4
        oĩ         OI5
        oị         OI6

.group ò
        ò          O2
        òi         OI2
        ò (A       w2

.group ó
        ó          O3
        ói         OI3
        ó (A       w3

.group ỏ
        ỏ          O4
        ỏi         OI4
        ỏ (A       w4

.group õ
        õ          O5
        õi         OI5
        õ (A       w5

.group ọ
        ọ          O6
        ọi         OI6
        ọ (A       w6


//=============================
.group ô
        ô          o
        ôi         oI

.group ồ
        ồ          o2
        ồi         oI2

.group ố
        ố          o3
        ối         oI3

.group ổ
        ổ          o4
        ổi         oI4

.group ỗ
        ỗ          o5
        ỗi         oI5

.group ộ
        ộ          o6
        ội         oI6



//=============================
.group ơ
        ơ          @:
        ơi         @:I
        ơu         @:U

.group ờ
        ờ          @:2
        ời         @:I2
        ờu         @:U2

.group ớ
        ớ          @:3
        ới         @:I3
        ớu         @:U3

.group ở
        ở          @:4
        ởi         @:I4
        ởu         @:U4

.group ỡ
        ỡ          @:5
        ỡi         @:I5
        ỡu         @:U5

.group ợ
        ợ          @:6
        ợi         @:I6
        ợu         @:U6



//=============================
.group u
        u          u
        u (A       w
     A) u          w
        ui         uI
        uì         uI2
        uí         uI3
        uỉ         uI4
        uĩ         uI5
        uị         uI6
        ua         u@
        uà         u@2
        uá         u@3
        uả         u@4
        uã         u@5
        uạ         u@6
        uô         u@
        uồ         u@2
        uố         u@3
        uổ         u@4
        uỗ         u@5
        uộ         u@6
        uôi        u@j
        uồi        u@j2
        uối        u@j3
        uổi        u@j4
        uỗi        u@j5
        uội        u@j6

.group ù
        ù          u2
        ù (A       w2
        ùi         uI2
        ùa         u@2

.group ú
        ú          u3
        ú (A       w3
        úi         uI3
        úa         u@3

.group ủ
        ủ          u4
        ủ (A       w4
        ủi         uI4
        ủa         u@4

.group ũ
        ũ          u5
        ũ (A       w5
        ũi         uI5
        ũa         u@5

.group ụ
        ụ          u6
        ụ (A       w6
        ụi         uI6
        ụa         u@6

//=============================
.group ư
        ư          y
        ưi         yI
        ưa         y@
        ươ         y@
        ườ         y@2
        ướ         y@3
        ưở         y@4
        ưỡ         y@5
        ượ         y@6
        ưu         yw
        ươi        y@j
        ười        y@j2
        ưới        y@j3
        ưởi        y@j4
        ưỡi        y@j5
        ượi        y@j6
        ươu        y@w
        ườu        y@w2
        ướu        y@w3
        ưởu        y@w4
        ưỡu        y@w5
        ượu        y@w6

.group ừ
        ừ          y2
        ừi         yI2
        ừa         y@2
        ừu         yw2

.group ứ
        ứ          y3
        ứi         yI3
        ứa         y@3
        ứu         yw3

.group ử
        ử          y4
        ửi         yI4
        ửa         y@4
        ửu         yw4

.group ữ
        ữ          y5
        ữi         yI5
        ữa         y@5
        ữu         yw5

.group ự
        ự          y6
        ựi         yI6
        ựa         y@6
        ựu         yw6



.group y
        y          i
        y (A       j
        ya         i@
        yà         i@2
        yá         i@3
        yả         i@4
        yã         i@5
        yạ         i@6
        yê         i@
        yề         i@2
        yế         i@3
        yể         i@4
        yễ         i@5
        yệ         i@6
//        yêu      i@U

.group ỳ
        ỳ          i2
        ỳ (A       j2
        ỳa         i@2

.group ý
        ý          i3
        ý (A       j3
        ýa         i@3

.group ỷ
        ỷ          i4
        ỷ (A       j4
        ỷa         i@4

.group ỹ
        ỹ          i5
        ỹ (A       j5
        ỹa         i@5

.group ỵ
        ỵ          i6
        ỵ (A       j6
        ỵa         i@6

.group 0xce   // Greek letters
// 0xce is the first byte of the utf-8 code for these characters 

        α          a:1n_|f'a:1
        ά          a:1n_|f'a:1
        β          b'e1_|t['a:1
        γ          Q'a:1_|m'a:1
        δ          J'E1n_|t['a:1
        ε          E1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        έ          E1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        ζ          D'e1_|t['a:1
        η          e1_|t['a:1
        ή          e1_|t['a:1
        θ          t'e1_|t['a:1
        ι          i1_|'o1_|t['a:1
        ί          i1_|'o1_|t['a:1
        κ          k'a:1p_|p'a:1
        λ          l'a1m_|_d'a:1
        μ          mw'i1
        ν          nw'i1
        ξ          s'i7
        ο          o1_|m'i1_|kz.'O7n

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

        π          p'i1
        ρ          z.'o1
        σ          s'i3c_|m'a:1
        ς          s'i3c_|m'a:1
        τ          t['o1
        υ          u1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        ύ          u1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        φ          f'i1
        χ          c'i1
        ψ          ps'i1
        ω          o1_|m'e1_|Q'a:7
        ώ          o1_|m'e1_|Q'a:7
        ό          o1_|m'i1_|kz.'O7n


.group
        %          f'@2n||tS;'am
        !          _:c'@3m_|t'a:7n_:
        ! (\! 
//            :            koUl@n
    D_) h (_DD_    D'@:2     // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
        $          d'o||l'a
        !=         x,o1N_|_b'a2N_
        >=         l'@:3n_|h'@:1n_|hw,a6kh_b'a2N
        <=         n^'O4_|h'@:1n_|hw,a6kh_b'a2N


    __) - (_D      cr'y2
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _


        .          c'@3m_
        . (.       _:
    \.) . 
